Illinois, session 104th, HB1364.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Joliet Arsenal Development Authority Act is 5amended by changing Sections 5, 15, 20, and 55 as follows: 6    (70 ILCS 508/5)7    Sec. 5. Purpose. The purpose of this Act is to facilitate 8and promote the utilization of property that is located along 9the Illinois Waterway throughout Will County and property 10formerly occupied and used by the United States government as 11an ammunition plant and arsenal and to replace and enhance the 12economic benefits generated by those former uses with 13diversified projects and land uses that will create new job 14opportunities and foster new economic development within the 15area.16(Source: P.A. 89-333, eff. 8-17-95.) 17    (70 ILCS 508/15)18    Sec. 15. Creation of Authority; Board members; officers. 19    (a) The Joliet Arsenal Development Authority is created as 20a political subdivision, body politic, and municipal 21corporation.22    (b) The territorial jurisdiction of the Authority shall   HB1364 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 07706 RTM 17751 b1extend over all of the territory, consisting of 3,000 acres, 2more or less, that is commonly known and described as the 3Joliet ammunition plant and arsenal and includes the 4municipalities of Channahon, Crest Hill, Elwood, Joliet, 5Lockport, Manhattan, Rockdale, Romeoville, Symerton, and 6Wilmington. The legal description of the territory is (1) 7approximately 1,900 acres located at the Arsenal, the 8approximate legal description of which includes part of 9section 30, Jackson Township, T34N R10E, and sections or part 10of sections 24, 25, 26, 35, and 36, Channahon Township, T34N 11R9E, Will County, Illinois, as depicted in the Arsenal Land 12Use Concept; and (2) approximately 1,100 acres, the 13approximate legal description of which includes part of 14sections 16, 17, and 18, Florence Township, T33N R10E, Will 15County, Illinois, as depicted in the Arsenal Land Use Concept.16    (c) The governing and administrative powers of the 17Authority shall be vested in its Board of Directors consisting 18of 15 10 members. Four of the members of the Board of Directors 19, 4 of whom shall be appointed by the Governor from Will 20County, by and with the advice and consent of the Senate. One 21of the members of the Board of Directors , and 6 of whom shall 22be appointed by the Will County Executive with the advice and 23consent of the Will County Board. The mayors of the 24municipalities of Channahon, Crest Hill, Elwood, Joliet, 25Lockport, Manhattan, Rockdale, Romeoville, Symerton, and 26Wilmington shall each appoint one member of the Board of   HB1364 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 07706 RTM 17751 b1Directors. All members appointed to the Board shall be 2residents of Will County. , but of the 6 members who are 3appointed by the Will County Executive, with the advice and 4consent of the Will County Board, one shall be a resident of 5the City of Joliet, one a resident of the City of Wilmington, 6one a resident of the Village of Elwood, one a resident of the 7Village of Manhattan, one a resident of the Village of 8Symerton, and one an at-large resident of Will County. Each 9city council or village board shall recommend 3 individuals 10who are residents of the city or village to the Will County 11Executive to be members of the Board of Directors. The Will 12County Executive shall choose one of the recommended 13individuals from each city and village and shall submit those 14names to the Will County Board for approval. All persons 15appointed as members of the Board shall have recognized 16ability and experience in one or more of the following areas: 17economic development, finance, banking, industrial 18development, small business management, real estate 19development, community development, venture finance, organized 20labor, units of local government, or civic, community, or 21neighborhood organization.22    (d) (Blank). Within 30 days after the effective date of 23this amendatory Act of the 96th General Assembly, the Will 24County Executive, with the advice and consent of the Will 25County Board, shall appoint the additional member of the Board 26for an initial term expiring on the third Monday in January,   HB1364 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 07706 RTM 17751 b12013. The member must be an at-large resident of Will County. 2The Board members holding office on the effective date of this 3amendatory Act of the 96th General Assembly shall continue to 4hold office for the remainder of their respective terms. All 5successors shall be appointed by the original appointing 6authority and hold office for a term of 4 years commencing the 7third Monday in January of the year in which their term 8commences, except in case of an appointment to fill a vacancy. 9Vacancies shall be filled for the remainder of the term. In 10case of vacancy in a Governor-appointed membership when the 11Senate is not in session, the Governor may make a temporary 12appointment until the next meeting of the Senate when a person 13shall be nominated to fill that office, and any person so 14nominated who is confirmed by the Senate shall hold office 15during the remainder of the term. Each member appointed to the 16Board shall serve until his or her successor is appointed and 17qualified.18    (d-10) Within 30 days after the effective date of this 19amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly, the mayors 20Romeoville, Lockport, Crest Hill, Rockdale, and Channahon 21shall each appoint one additional member of the Board for an 22initial term expiring on the third Monday in January of the 23year in which their term commences. The Board members holding 24office on the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 25104th General Assembly shall continue to hold office for the 26remainder of their respective terms, and any vacancy in their   HB1364 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 07706 RTM 17751 b1terms shall be filled by the original appointing authority. 2Upon the expiration of the term of the Board member holding 3office on the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 4104th General Assembly who was appointed by the Will County 5Executive and is a resident of the City of Joliet, the mayor of 6Joliet shall appoint that member's successor. Upon the 7expiration of the term of the Board member holding office on 8the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 9Assembly who was appointed by the Will County Executive and is 10a resident of the City of Wilmington, the mayor of Wilmington 11shall appoint that member's successor. Upon the expiration of 12the term of the Board member holding office on the effective 13date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly who 14was appointed by the Will County Executive and is a resident of 15the Village of Elwood, the mayor of Elwood shall appoint that 16member's successor. Upon the expiration of the term of the 17Board member holding office on the effective date of this 18amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly who was appointed 19by the Will County Executive and is a resident of the Village 20of Manhattan, the mayor of Manhattan shall appoint that 21member's successor. Upon the expiration of the term of the 22Board member holding office on the effective date of this 23amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly who was appointed 24by the Will County Executive and is a resident of the Village 25of Symerton, the mayor of Symerton shall appoint that member's 26successor.   HB1364 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 07706 RTM 17751 b1    (e) The Chairperson of the Board shall be elected by the 2Board annually from among the members who are appointed by the 3Will County Executive from among the members of the Board.4    (f) The Governor may remove any member of the Board in case 5of incompetency, neglect of duty, or malfeasance in office.6    (g) Members of the Board shall serve without compensation 7for their services as members but may be reimbursed for all 8necessary expenses incurred in connection with the performance 9of their duties as members.10    (h) The Board may appoint an Executive Director who shall 11have a background in finance, including familiarity with the 12legal and procedural requirements of issuing bonds, real 13estate or economic development, and administration. The 14Executive Director shall hold office at the discretion of the 15Board. The Executive Director shall be the chief 16administrative and operational officer of the Authority, shall 17direct and supervise its administrative affairs and general 18management, shall perform such other duties as may be 19prescribed from time to time by the Board, and shall receive 20compensation fixed by the Board. The Executive Director shall 21attend all meetings of the Board; however, no action of the 22Board or the Authority shall be invalid on account of the 23absence of the Executive Director from a meeting. The Board 24may engage the services of such other agents and employees, 25including attorneys, appraisers, engineers, accountants, 26credit analysts and other consultants, and may prescribe their   HB1364 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 07706 RTM 17751 b1duties and fix their compensation.2    (i) The Board shall meet on the call of its Chairperson or 3upon written notice of 8 6 members of the Board.4(Source: P.A. 96-1122, eff. 7-20-10.) 5    (70 ILCS 508/20)6    Sec. 20. Actions of the Authority. All official acts of 7the Authority shall require the affirmative vote of a simple 8majority at least 6 members of the Board members at a meeting 9of the Board at which the members casting those affirmative 10votes are present. It is the duty of the Authority to promote 11development within its territorial jurisdiction. The Authority 12shall use the powers conferred on it by this Act to assist in 13the development, construction, and acquisition of industrial 14or commercial projects within its territorial jurisdiction.15    Eight 6 members shall constitute a quorum, and the Board 16may not meet or take any action without a quorum present. 17(Source: P.A. 103-517, eff. 8-11-23.) 18    (70 ILCS 508/55)19    Sec. 55. Abolition of Authority. The Authority shall be 20abolished upon the last to occur of the following: (1) 21expiration of the 35-year 30-year period that begins on the 22effective date of this Act; or (2) one year after all revenue 23bonds, notes, and other evidences of indebtedness of the 24Authority have been fully paid and discharged or otherwise   HB1364 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 07706 RTM 17751 b1provided for. Upon the abolition of the Authority, all of its 2rights and property shall pass to and be vested in Will County 3the State.4(Source: P.A. 102-699, eff. 4-19-22.)